[You saved me, Teio. It was a bit dangerous just then]



While happy because of Hajime’s words, the black dragon which was Teio was seen regaining steepness after bringing down the powerful enemy and came besides Hajime while fluttering her wings.



“I’m glad above all else that I made it on time, later chastise…….I want a reward”



[…….I’ll think about it if you manage to protect sensei]



“Really! Don’t go forgetting those words now! Sa~a, sensei-dono, you should get on mistress’s back”



Hajime, in such a situation Teio is still faithful to her own desires (In retrospect, Yue, Shia, and Kaori are too but,) with an amazed expression, Aiko who was embraced closely was put on her back.



Aiko somehow felt an odd sensation from the two’s conversation, she clung obediently on Teio’s back because now she won’t be weighing him down any longer.



[Ehtto, Teio-san. My best regards]



“Umu. Leave it to me. After all sensei is an important person to master (in the sense of a teacher), I won’t let you fall into enemy hands”



Aiko further increased her misunderstanding from the words “important person” that Teio said, and anxiously looked at Hajime. However you looked at it, it wasn’t the expression of anxiety that a teacher has towards a student, it was the air of a lady in love, however there wasn’t anyone there to tsukkomi.



And at that time, the tower which Nointo plunged into blew off from the ground with a roaring sound. A thick cloud of dust danced around and from the wind pressure of Nointo’s silver wings, it was all blown away and showed her unhurt form. Teio’s breath didn’t seem to be able to pierce through the silver wings defences.



[……Teio, go]



“Aye. However, I’ll come back to help after sensei-dono’s safety is secured? At the very least, mistress will do something about the people of the church”



Towards Hajime who was already staring at Nointo with intense blood thirst, Teio managed to guess awhile ago the cause of the magic which was weakening Hajime, she reliably declared while staring at Ishtar’s group. Hajime continued to focus on Nointo.



When those words were heard, Hajime simply nodded once and then charged fiercely towards Nointo through the air.



[Nagumo-kun! Be careful! Please…..]



“…….Fumu? Ho~o…well well…..”



Towards Aiko who was posed with both hands united in front of her chest praying, Teio seemed to have guessed what was going on and became interested, in other words she let out a, this is going to be interesting, voice.



“Sensei-dono. Though I understand you’re worried about master, I’m in a bit of a rush. I’ll send you onto the ground, then mistress will beat around the old damaged group over there. It wouldn’t do for master to be obstructed after all”



Aiko said, wait, as Teio began to turn around. For what though, Teio glanced at Aiko who was on her back by bending her neck, Aiko returned the glance with a determined look.



[Teio-san. If you put me down on the ground now, wouldn’t having to come back after dropping me off take up quite a bit of time? This is 8,000 meters in the sky. Going back and forth should be quite harsh…..]



“Mu? Certainly, that’s absolutely right, but……sensei-dono, you can’t be thinking to”



[Yes. If Teio-san intends to fight for Nagumo-kun’s sake then, please allow me to help. If you don’t immediately do something about Ishtar-san’s group, Nagumo-kun would quickly weaken. It would be a waste of time to send me back down onto the ground]



What Aiko says is possible however honestly Teio is reluctant.



Although a lot of people seemed to have been injured by the Orkan’s attack, if you looked Ishtar is preparing to sing the hymn again while also constructing a barrier, Teio wanted to blow them all away as well. But, if by chance Aiko gets hurt, the promise with Hajime would disappear.



“But, it may be bad of me to say this to sensei-dono, but what can you do? Without magic formations nor battle experience? Can you fight against the priests and their knights?”



Teio’s opinion was severe which caused Aiko to strongly grit her teeth and then she slowly moved her finger towards her mouth. And with her eyes closed, she bit and made a cut on her finger, the blood that dripped from her finger tip was used to draw magic formations by smearing it onto the back of her opposite hand.



[I, may not look like it but in terms of magical powers I’m equal to Amanogawa-kun who is the hero. Though I don’t have any battle experience……I’ll show you that I can properly assist you! Fighting against another person….honestly I’m scared, but I have no other choice but to do it. From now on, in order for everyone to survive and return to Japan, more than anyone else, I must not run away!]



The kingdom that was sceptical to invasion, even the king had become a fanatic like the priests. Relying on God who planned out everything in the first place is no longer an option. In order to survive in this world now, Aiko and them must continue advancing ahead.



If that’s so, as the teacher, even if she was avoided for it, what must be done, must be done. Teio understood from the determination in Aiko’s eyes, though she still hesitated, she decided to permit Aiko tagging along because there was no other way.



“Its inevitable if you’ve already made your final decision. If it’s Sensei-dono’s will, then Master wouldn’t have any complaints. As you wish. Shall we blow up those fools together!”



[Yes!]



Aiko’s tension and fear, and the answer which made up the decision that signaled their movements appeared, Teio flew towards the great church which symbolized the priests in a quick dash. Their enemies were the priests and temple knights which were made up of hundreds of people. Now, a different tag team named Teio and Aiko challenged this worlds largest religious head temple.





Chapter 103




The first blow was with Schlagen.



A bright red spark gushed out, the bullet was shot out at super speeds that contained ferocious destructive power from the monsters weapon and straight towards it’s target. The bombardment of bullets specialized in penetration which even pierced through Teio’s breath from up front, as expected Nointo decided to evade rather than using decomposition from her silver wings to stop it.



She twisted her body as she fell and while she avoided the bright red flash which went over right above her head, she rushed at Hajime at a dreadful speed.



However, he read through her attack and had already placed cross bitts in the way, they fired exploding slug bullets and in the direct hit they released a roaring sound.



[~!?]



Nointo noticed the bright red ripples coming from the exploding slug bullets, did she consider that her silver wings wouldn’t be in time, she used her large sword which she held in her hand to intercept them.



The large sword was swung at godlike speeds, it abruptly cut through the bullets into 2 as if they were butter. What was decomposed was the magic power that was inside of the exploding slug bullets though, however it wasn’t possible for just a swing from a large sword to cut through everything, bullets were shot from both the left and right sides and shock waves were released.



Although it’s power has decreased, Nointo was exposed to a direct shockwave and momentarily her movements stopped.



In front of her bosom was Hajime who closed the distance within that instant. By using quake legs in the air through use of “Aerodynamic”, he began compressing power into his left arm, “Oscillation Pulverizer” and the mechanic “Bursting Shotgun”, and with the full extent of his power “Impact Conversion” was poured into “Grand Arm” and the huge magic was released.



Nointo immediately used her 2 large swords as a shield. One of the large swords*At one point they started naming the swords but it was too much of a pain lol* was used to block the fist before the impact was fully released. She barely made it at the last second, she managed to stop Hajime’s steel fist.



However, she wasn’t able to suppress it’s power, Gaa~aan! The colliding of metal resounded out with a terrible roar, Nointo was blown away by the intense force.



Dopaaaan~! Dopaaaan~!



Hajime didn’t slack and continued his pursuit. Donner and Schlag was immediately pulled out and fired at maximum power. 2 roaring explosions were heard. 2 bright red flashes tore through the dark night. However, Nointo crossed both her swords as she blew off to take on a defensive stance as there was going to be 12 impacts incoming.



[Kuuuu~!!]



For each attack that Donner and Schlag shot, the fast attacks were only heard as one attack, with super pin-point precision, every bullet landed in the same place. Simultaneously, Nointo groaned with every one of them, her large swords trembled from the impacts and ~Piki~ an unpleasant sound was slightly heard.



Hajime wondered to himself if he should feel amazed that the durability of the 2 large swords was able to withstand 12 railguns and his fist attack with his whole body put into it and still didn’t break.



She was blown away even further, once again, Nointo was buried after destroying some facilities that were solemnly decorated by the church. Hajime took Orkan out of his “Treasure Warehouse” and launched all his rockets just in case.



Bashuuuuu~!!



The group of rockets lit off sparks and dealt fatal wounds onto the building which was on the verge of collapsing. The building collapsed completely along with a great explosion, it was wrapped up in great flames reaching 3,000 degrees celsius from the large amount of tar being stored inside the rockets.



While looking at the great flames which dyed the night sky in red, Hajime still didn’t loosen his guard yet. He reloaded rockets into Orkan from the “Treasure Warehouse”, and once again, he took aim at the mountain of rubble that was burning brightly.



Then, at that moment,



[~, from below]



Right as Hajime jumped and looked down underneath him, the ground where he once stood at exploded before his eyes, Nointo flapped her silver wings and flew out of the hole. It appears that she managed to save herself from the rest of the assault by using magic to go underneath the ground.



A large amount of silver feathers were shot out like a machinegun and she also released her silver bombardment. They exchanged blows while swaying around like a blown leaf in the wind, She crossed her twin swords together and from the small gap, a sword attack came through from the side and was warded off by the rail gun*I think this sentence goes like this*. Then Hajime launched missiles at Nointo.



Nointo who understood Orkan’s power by experiencing it with her body, flew away quickly while releasing silver lights to get away from the pursuing missiles. While she released silver feathers to intercept the missile, she also created magic formations to launch magic attacks in fierce waves towards Hajime.



countless missiles were shot out and explosive flames in full bloom rained down from the night sky, Hajime put Orkan away and immediately pulled out Donner and Schlag again. He quickly shot through the core of the magic attacks that were heading at him and Nointo similarly brought down all the missiles.



A small silence came from the intervals of the fierce aerial battle. Nointo and Hajime were facing eachother in the air.



[Na~a, I’ve got something I want to ask, will you hear me out for a bit?]



[…..What is it?]



The Ninozku invading the Kingdom’s capital shouldn’t be unknown to the church. He was one-sidedly attacked without being able to ask his questions, so a temporary truce was given because Nointo decided to listen, It was the perfect time for Hajime to continue talking.



[The things that are happening on the ground. At this rate wouldn’t the Kingdom fall into ruins? Next is obviously, this [Kamiyama]. Rather than waste your time fighting me, shouldn’t you be fighting the Majinzoku?]



Hajime stated a reasonable question, however, Nointo snorted through her nose conveying that it was a foolish question.



[If it comes to that then that’ll probably be the conclusion for this era]



[The end. …..As I thought, “Ehito” only sees “humans” as another “person”, we’re only pieces for them to waste time on. ……By chance, the human beings were chosen for this era this time around? At the rate this is going, is Ehito on the Majinzoku God’s side, or has he become their subordinate]



[……..If so what are you going to do about it?]



[No, I just thought I’d check up on the amount of credibility “The Liberator’s” stories had? After all, to me, both sides are still just suspicious people]



Nointo’s eyebrow twitches when she heard that her master was called a suspicious person. However, Hajime didn’t worry about it and continued talking with a smile.



[Na~a, if I’m in the way why don’t they just send me back to my former world? Also, the heroes as well, if the Kingdom is to be wiped out already wouldn’t that mean that they didn’t have much of a role at all?]



[Your request is rejected, Irregular]



[Can I hear the reason?]



[It’s because the master wishes for it. The master desires your death, Irregular. Eliminating all difficulties, obtaining immense power and strong comrades…..and then, completely ruining the balance. My master absolutely wishes for your death. That’s why, in a way that you’ll suffer the most, lamenting your choices, then finally ending you while tasting regret and despair. To the maximum amount in order to give my master the highest delight possible. Ahh, about the heroes….there was quite an elaborate and interesting idea, rather the master’s become very interested. Therefore, while you’re still here as a piece, continue dancing around to please my master.]



Hajime wasn’t worried at all and agreed within his mind, he shrugged his shoulders as the answer was roughly what he expected it to be after hearing what Miredei Raisen had told them before. In other words, [Those fellows were certainly trash].



However, rather than himself, those last words made him anxious.



[……An interesting idea?]



[It’s not necessary for you to know as you’ll be dying very soon]



The talk had ended, Nointo immediately shot out countless magics and silver feathers to resume the battle.



More over, it’s power was on a whole different dimension from a while ago. The power that a single feather had was roughly comparable to the railguns and every magic attack was near infinite levels of power. If you looked closely, every part of Nointo’s body was clad in silver magic and it came with an overwhelming intimidation. It looked just like the “Limit Breakthrough” that Hajime and Kouki used.



[~!]



While holding his breath against the extreme waves of attacks that consisted of overwhelming power, Hajime held Metsurai in his right hand and Schlagen in his left and continued to fight back. Metsurai roared and shot out 12,000 bullets per minute which completely negated the silver feathers and magic attacks, meanwhile Schlagen’s bullets pierced through in a single-file line towards Nointo.



However, Nointo’s movements while clad in the silver light was incomparable to what it was before. The moment Schlagen’s bright red bombardment pierced through Nointo, her body vanished like haze and appeared several meters away.



Nointo had caused a mirage of afterimages due to her shear speed of dodging the bullet and her body continued to slightly blur as is.



Hajime “Read Ahead*I dono if this is supposed to actually be a skill or not however it was in quotes, if it is then I probably could have named it Foresight, ??*” and used cross bitts to shoot exploding slug bullets, however once again they only shot through her afterimage. Nointo who completely disappeared ~Zazazazazaza~ created afterimages in the next instant and appeared behind Hajime. And like a spinning top, she swung her twin large swords and spun along with its centrifugal force that contained immense power.



[~!?]



Nointo’s last movements far exceeded Hajime’s perception with “Light Speed” active, it was a complete surprise attack. Though he just barely managed to lean his body back to avoid a direct hit, Schlagen which was used as a shield was cut into two. It’s built-in energy discharged by accident and a huge explosion erupted in between Hajime and Nointo.



That momentarily caused Nointo to delay her pursuit. however it allowed Hajime enough time to counterattack. Hajime’s body became clad in bright red magic. He had used “Limit Breakthrough”.



Towards Nointo who was advancing, Hajime also advanced a step. Metsurai was no longer in his hands, instead he held onto Donner and Schlag. From that point on it was going to be super close combat.



[Tsuaaa~!!]



[Haaaaa~!!]



Immediately after Hajime dodged the half-swung large sword, both large swords were swung at his body with exquisite timing. Using Schlag he repelled one sword by shooting a railgun at its center and the other was deflected with the upperside of its barrel, Donner in his right hand was aimed directly at Nointo’s heart. A bright red flash shot out but Nointo dodge while rotating and left an afterimage, with its momentum she swung her large swords with increased power.



In order to oppose the decomposition, Hajime applied a heavy concentration of “Intensive Strengthening” from “Vajra” onto Schlag which was several times it’s normal density, rather than going against the full brunt of the attack he used Schlag to deflect the first sword upwards.



And towards the 2nd large sword that was swung horizontally, he received it’s blade with the muzzle while still clad in “Intensive Strengthening” from “Vajra” and fired as is. With a flash of light, an explosion sounded out and the 2nd large sword flew away.



They were both within point-blank distance and while dodging and diverting their opponents weapons, they forgot to breath as their fierce attacks continued without being able to deal a fatal blow.



[Ooooooooo~!!!]



[Haaaaaaaaa~!!!]



Unaware, Hajime and Nointo began to shout out.



One tendon or a nerve line, with just one misstep, death would settle in at the next moment. There was no time to pay attention to each others attacks, they only relied on their experiences and instincts while swinging their sword and firing their guns which shaved off their lives a little bit at a time.



The silver sword left a trail of light through the dark night and the bright red flash flew in all directions like blood spraying. If both attacks were being compared to the sun, their storm of attacks would be considered a flare. In one second, in order to continue surviving they dodge each others attacks and their speeds rose without bounds.



In proportion, if they were slightly grazed blood would be stain everywhere. Hajime had shallow cuts everywhere on his body, Nointo was dripping blood from where she was gouged.



Hajime and Nointo’s abilities were equal. The way things were going, the battle of offense and defense was thought to continue on for eternity, however Hajime was being cornered. No, to be accurate, he was going to be corned.



Hajime had already understood. Because none of Nointo’s magical power has been consumed since the start of the battle.



Needless to say, Hajime had a time limit on using “Limit Breakthrough”. It’ll forcefully cancel itself and leave him in a weakened state for a while. Although Hajime’s magical power was huge, it wouldn’t be able to keep up indefinitely.



On the other hand, Nointo was apparently gaining a supply of magical power from somewhere else which allowed her to continue her strengthening and was virtually unrestricted. Hajime’s Magic Eye was shining brightly, he was able to see that something similar to a magic stone was lodged into nointo’s heart.



Hajime decided that if things stayed the way they were, he’d gradually be beaten.



[Be blown away~!]



Dododododo!!!!



Simultaneously with the shout, Hajime had the cross bitts fire exploding slug bullets while he was still within the blasts vicinity.



[Have you gone mad]



Nointo’s inorganic eyes slightly opened widely. Her eyes carried a color of doubt which questioned Hajime’s sanity.



Dozens of exploding slug bullets were shot out by the 6 cross bitts immediately and made countless ripples centering around Hajime and Nointo. Nointo wrapped her silver wings around her body at once and Hajime also used “Vajra” to its maximum output.



Zudoooooooooooon~!!!!!!



Immediately following that, a bright red flower of light bloomed above in the night sky. Needless to say, the immense shockwave blew away Hajime and Nointo.



It was a terrifying shockwave, it pierced through “Vajra” and caused quite a bit of damage to Hajime’s body. As evidence, Hajime was grandly spraying blood everywhere. He was covered in wounds.



Nointo didn’t get away free of harm either, because she couldn’t wrap herself on time, she was also gushing with wounds and she coughed out blood as well. It seems that the impact reached her internal organs.



[……Were you going for a double suicide?]



[Ha~a, Ha~a…..suiciding with you? Ha, that’s a harsh joke. Only say those lines if you’re a good woman and my lover]



Nointo unintentionally had eyes of doubt from the rash attack, Hajime replied jokingly while breathing roughly. It had a hint of ridicule for wanting to be together with her as a friend for their last moments*Improvised don’t actually get this sentence, ??????????????????????????????*.



Hajime then took out a new weapon from the “Treasure Warehouse”. And then he threw out cards which flew at high speeds.



Soundlessly, you would likely lose sight of it if you weren’t paying attention even though it should be there, However, Nointo hit them away as if they were nothing with her large sword.



Kakin~! Kakin~! a rough sound resounded, while spinning around in the air, a Engetsu ring—doughnut shaped disk about 15 centimeters in diameter, or, a throwing weapon called a Chakram.



[Now this. Have you run out of-!?]



Dopan! Dopan! Dopan! Dopan! Dopan! Dopan!



Towards the primitive weapons, Nointo had slightly relaxed her guard towards Hajime, railguns shot out from(. . .)Hajime’s right and left hands.



Immediately afterwards, bright red flashes of light appeared on Nointo’s left and right side(. . .)who was facing Hajime, her head would be crushed by the assault.



Nointo couldn’t release her words due to the impossible situation, she immediately positioned her twin large swords by her side as shields. All 12 bullets that were discharged by Donner and Schlag were exploding bullets. And just like before, they were pin-point accuracy attacks.



Why did the bullets shoot out from completely different directions and had Nointo pincered.



That was because of the Engetsu rings that Hajime threw out earlier. The Engetsu rings had “Sign Interception” and “Air Claws” built into them through generation magic, although they’re a stealthy and assassination typed throwing weapon, more than that, it was an artifact with a special effect.



It’s gate function was what made it possible to kill the Clione*the Immortal monster* at [Merujine Undersea Ruins]. In other words, the vacant hole in the Engetsu ring is directly connected to the same space with the other Engetsu rings, if you shot a bullet through it, it’ll jump through space and appear out from the hole of another Engetsu ring. Of course he’s also able to remotely control them just like the cross bitts.



Protecting her head were her twin large swords, the exploding bullets that calculated Nointo’s every move jumped through space, every bullet left no gaps and reached their intended targets, a terrific shock wave surged out.



In the next instant,



Bakin~!



Bakin~!



Along with the sounds, Nointo’s large swords broke down from the middle.



[Na-! Why, from just this much……]



Though she said that, there was no feelings in her voice, however Nointo was openly surprised.



However, she herself probably didn’t notice. After Hajime released the first pin-point shots, ever since the they were in the middle of their extreme close combat battle, he had continued to aim all impacts towards the crack that had appeared on Nointo’s large sword rather than at her actual body. Simply because they were equal in ability, he was waiting for the chance that would come along with breaking her weapon.



Hajime certainly didn’t miss the chance that Nointo gave him, he took out a new artifact from his “Treasure Warehouse” and threw it continuously. Nointo had no time to dodge the 10 artifacts that were thrown out at high speeds, at once, she tried to fend them off with her broken large swords.



However, that was a bad move against this artifact. What was thrown out were round ore’s with wires attached to them.



It was a capturing tool called a bola which was commonly known as a throwing weapon. Usually, after hitting its target, with enough centrifugal force it’ll start rotating, because it had built-in induction stones it could easily achieve enough speed when thrown immediately. And naturally, the thing that Hajime created was not just a simple bola.



[~! This is, I can’t move!]



The handles of Nointo’s large swords, both her arms, waist, and feet were entangled by the bola, meanwhile the spherical ores produced a ripple as they floated in the air. That was due to the effect of space magic which was created through generation magic. The weights are fixed into space itself, thus the captured object is also fixed in place.



In the first place, Nointo had the decomposition ability, so he had less than 10 seconds before she manages to actually break free. Moreover it wasn’t possible to restrain her wings because they were composed of her magic, so she would probably just reuse her magic to create new ones. As things stand, the silver wings will likely remove the constraints fairly easily.



But, Hajime’s aim is only several few seconds. A one hit kill——the strongest possible blow that he could dish out in these few seconds!



Hajime pulled out a large cylinder weapon which measured up to 2 meters in length from his “Treasure Warehouse”. It was the pile bunker. Kiiiiiiii~!! letting out a particular sound and charged with bright red thunder sparking out. Then, he charged straight towards Nointo.



[Ku]



Nointo leaked out a bitter voice and wrapped herself with her silver wings like a cocoon. Silver magic containing decomposition shone out brightly, it looked exactly like a moon.



Hajime slammed pile bunker directly into that beauty and created a terrific shockwave. Immediately after that, it’s newly added space fixation function activated and 4 arms appeared, pile bunker was fixed in place while going against the decomposition. The bright red sparks were already at critical stages and rampaged intensely.



[Endure it if you can]



Hajime’s lips were smiling fearlessly and his eyes were glaring with murderous intent. The bright red magical power of “Limit Breakthrough” shined more and more, soon the silver moon was completely dyed into a bright red moon.



Afterwards, an invisible impact surged out from the pile bunkers exit hole. It was the function which caused space vibrations built into the exit hole. It was a simplified version of the space magic “Tremble Heaven”, it shot a fierce vibration towards the target, the combination—–caused the targets durability to decrease drastically.



And along with gravity magic at the moment of the impact, the jet black stake increased it’s weight up to 20 tons and was released with a roaring sound like a thunder.



Dogooooooooooooooo~!!!!



At zero distance with Explosive charge that was compressed and shock wave conversion magic, the stake made of Azanthium drilled down in godlike speeds of acceleration due to the electromagnetic induction and it completely destroyed its prey.



The jet black stake released bright red sparks and easily pierced through the 2 silver wings, it penetrated through Nointo’s heart and still continued further, it went straight through her body and tore off a wing from its root. Then just like a meteor, it flew away into the distance while emitting a red trail.



[——-]



[………]



What remained was Nointo’s figure with a hole literally opened at the place where her magical power supply source was. Blood probably didn’t spill out because the wound was completely charred by “Thunder Clad”, it was just a body with a hole punctured in its chest which makes it not feel human at all. The eyes that peeped out were cold and mechanical as ever and the silver wings dispersed into the air.



It was simply still, Hajime seemed to have some mixed feelings about the reproachful atmosphere……



While looking at Nointo’s eyes, it quickly lost its light and became hollow, while tilting a little, her body fell down onto a remote hillside nearby the churches building. On the surface of the dark mountain, Nointo’s silver glow shined brightly.



When Hajime got down by her side, he pulled out Donner and aimed it at her head. Although his Magic Eye and his perception system ability showed that Nointo was definitely dead, he felt uneasy unless he shot a bullet into her head. It was a nasty habit of his.



At the moment when Hajime was about to pull the trigger on Donner,



Zudoooooooooooooooooo~!!!!!



A huge explosion roared out and caused [Kamiyama] to shake severely. The spectacle that greeted Hajime’s eyes when he looked back was……..the church and its cathedral collapsing while a huge mushroom cloud formed from it with a roaring sound.



[…….No way] Hajime’s unintentional mutter echoed out rather clearly.





Chapter 104




[……No way]



Unintentionally, Hajime voiced out as he watched the huge mushroom cloud that scorched the night sky. A long time ago, while stunned he remembered a scene from a war documentary that he saw on TV, then suddenly a telepathy came.



“Ma, master…..how are things on your side?”



“O? O~o, Teio huh. No, things on this side just ended….”



“Fumu, that’s great then. As expected of master. We’ve just finished up on this side as well but, can you join up with us?”



“No, something amazing just…..”



“…..We already know of the cause. Or rather, it’s mistress and co.’s fault…..”



“…..What was that?”



“For the time being, can you join up with us?”



“Ha~a, I got it”



It seems the cause of how the church’s head temple completely collapsed is known, just what, Hajime quickly moved to meet up with Teio while his cheeks cramped up. While going up into the sky, Teio’s black dragon form was quickly discovered in the air at a distance away from the mushroom cloud.



And, in Hajime’s eyes, Aiko who was riding on Teio’s back had an, [Awawawa], kind of feeling with panicking emotions reflected. The question, Why is Aiko here? appeared within his head, judging by Aiko’s personality, she most likely begged Teio to stay and cooperated instead of running away in order to help Hajime. Rather than that, its obvious that Aiko was in a worried state of [I’ve went and done it now] kind of feeling.



[…..Sensei, Teio. You both seem to be fine]



[Na, Nagumo-kun! Thank goodness you were safe. ……Really, thank goodness]



“Master. Umu, for a moment there we thought that you were dead, but you’re still alive. Jeez, as expected of master’s sensei-dono. I didn’t expect mistresses dragon breath to completely eradicate the entire church itself. It was heavenly brilliant”



Towards Teio’s words, Hajime could only blink. And with a “It can’t be” expression, he turned towards Aiko.



[…..Sensei, just what exactly did you do]



[Awawawawawa, th, thas*not a typo, she’s flustered* wrong! I didn’t mean for this to. The church’s barrier was a pretty strong…..if Teio-san’s breaths power was increased then……we only intended to break the barrier but……]



Although Aiko leaked out a sigh of relief when she saw Hajime’s appearance, she began to panic again when Hajime asked her questions. It appears that this is what you get when you ask a panicked Aiko questions.



Aiko while riding on Teio, was determined to fight so that Ishtar’s magic which caused an abnormal state wouldn’t be used on Hajime. However, even with a high aptitude for magic, Aiko who didn’t have a satisfactory magic formation wasn’t able to release strong magic attacks. And again, the cathedral itself seemed to be an artifact which created a powerful barrier, If Ishtar was being protected within the barrier, then even Teio’s breath wouldn’t be able to reach him.



If this continues, Ishtar will be able to calmly use magic from a safe zone. She thought about whether or not there was a way to obtain more power to exceed the barrier as they dodge the temple knights attacks, what Aiko came up with was……to take advantage of her own special skills. By the way, Aiko’s abilities are as followed,



[+Remote Fermentation]



Among these skills, it seems that she used Fermentation Operation. About [Kamiyama], since there are lots of people living here, there was a large amount of things that could be fermented. With that in mind, she seemed to have tried to performed methane fermentation like on earth. To be exact it was a replica with different world substances, however there was no change in it being flammable gas.



While single-mindedly spreading it around the church. It wasn’t a magic attack so the church’s barrier didn’t react as it was merely fermentation and it actively collected within and outside of the barrier just like air. In order to keep it within a certain range, Teio used manipulated the wind to blow them into a fixed location.



And, with so much flammable gas gathered like this, combined with Teio’s breath it would be possible to destroy the church’s barrier, with that, when she released her breath……



[…..It became like this]



“Umu. Mistress and co. blew them away on a grand scale, it’s been a long time since I’ve last felt death. Far from destroying the barrier, the church itself erupted…….such a method, throughout mistresses life she’s never thought of anything like this. As expected of master’s sensei-dono. I’m impressed”



[Thas wrong! It wasn’t like that! I didn’t think it’ll explode so much like this! Just that, I thought I shouldn’t half-ass it! That’s the truth! Ha~!? Everyone of the church!? What’s become of them!?]



Aiko made excuses while flustering and teary eyed, her eyes began to wander towards the church ruins. Hajime and Teio also looked towards the mountain of ruins.



[……..Ma~a, they were likely blown away with it]



“The church just put too much faith in their barrier. It was also a surprise attack, completely defenseless against that blast, it’s likely none are alive”



[A, ah…..it can’t…..saying that, although I prepared myself for this…..]



Having been an accomplice, Aiko’s face turned pale as she was the cause that led to the explosion killing everyone of the church. Although she steeled herself for the battle, she can’t regain her composure when the results were being pointed out.



Unintentionally she vomited on the spot. To Aiko who was crying and vomiting, Hajime scratched his head ~Kari Kari~, and quietly snuggled up with Aiko. And he held Aiko’s hands without minding that it was dirty with vomit. The current Aiko required warmth.



Aiko felt warmth being transmitted through her numb hands and her frozen heart melted. And, just for now, she forgot everything related to a teacher and student relationship, she leaped onto Hajime’s chest and clung on tightly while sobbing.



“……Mistress’s back……”



Teio voiced her sad opinion while looking at the terrible sight of her back, she immediately used Reproduction Magic to restore her scales. Teio also desired to allow Aiko some time to recover, she was the one who shot the breath to begin with so Aiko didn’t have to feel more responsibility than necessary, however right now wasn’t the right time to explain that. So, with Reproduction Magic, she slightly healed her worn-out soul.



Aiko whose energy returns, looks up from Hajime’s chest. Although it’s become a terrible scene because she has so much snot, tears, and vomit, Hajime didn’t particularly mind and simply took out some water and towel from the “Treasure Warehouse” and cleaned up the dirty Aiko. Although Aiko was upset to have shown such disgraceful behavior, she remained as is.



[Have you calmed down? Sensei]



[Y, yes. I, I’m fine now. Nagumo-kun…..]



Aiko who pulled herself back together after Hajime’s question, her face was dyed in red with shame and what not. Somehow, Hajime’s voice causes her fever up. The eyes glancing upwards and staring were feverish and moist. No matter how you looked at it, that wasn’t caused by only a sense of shame, rather it was the expression which held special feelings.



Hajime only saw Aiko as a teacher and not a “woman” however, as expected, when such an expression is being shown, [Are~? Isn’t something about this different? Is it possibly, that kind?], he managed to understand Aiko’s feelings and his cheek cramped up.



This was dangerous in various ways, Hajime immediately adverted his eyes and Teio voiced out a word of caution.



“Master. There’s a person. He clearly doesn’t seem to be ordinary…..”



[What was that?]



It couldn’t be, its surprising that anyone could have survived that kind of explosion, Hajime looked in the direction that Teio was looking, there was definitely a man with a bald head and wearing white vestments descending, Hajime and them stared directly at him. However, as Teio said, he definitely wasn’t an ordinary person. That was because his body was transparent and he was swinging waveringly.



Did the man with the bald head guess that Hajime and them had recognized him, he turned around and started heading back, he was moving as if gravity didn’t exist and slipped and slid to the other side of the mountain rubble. And he turned around just before he disappeared to glance over at Hajime and them.



[……Is he trying to tell us to follow?]



“Probably. What should we do, master”



[……That’s right, although I want to quickly meet up with Yue and them……to begin with, we came here to look for the Age of Gods magic. It’s possible that this is somehow related to that. We can’t afford to miss clues]



“Fumu, That’s right. Well then, lets chase after him”



With Hajime’s words, Teio nods once and flaps her wings to land on the ruins, after unloading Hajime and Aiko, she reverted back to human form. And she noticed the dirt on her back, with lowered eyebrows, she took out new clothes from the “Treasure Warehouse”. Hajime also noticed his state and pulled out some extra clothes from the “Treasure Warehouse” and finished changing quickly.



[A~u, s, sorry…..I’ve made you dirty]



The cause was Aiko, she apologized and her small frame became even smaller with shame. As a woman, it’s unbearably shameful to have vomited on another person’s clothes.



Hajime and Teio also understood that there was no helping it, they wanted to tell her not to mind it, but it wasn’t such a simple thing to do. Anyways, with the little exchange from a while ago, Aiko had accepted her feelings, therefore, she’s begun to think about various things about Hajime in particular.



However, it would be a problem if she stayed curled up forever, Hajime quickly changed the topic.



[Sensei, sorry for making you tag along. Though I don’t know what will happen…..we need to make sure of that bald guy’s identity]



[Y, yes, I understand. …..I’ll follow along with Nagumo-kun……]



Hajime thought that there was a strange power and heat from those last words she spoke, but he daringly pretended not to notice and stepped into the place where the bald man had disappeared.



The bald man’s figure is shown once in a while as they advanced through the ruins. And after 5 minutes of walking they finally reached their destination, the bald man stood quietly while looking straight at Hajime’s group.



[Who are you? What do you want with us?]



[……..]



The bald man did not answer Hajime’s question, however he did point silently with his finger. Although the place was just a heap of rubble, the old man’s glance seems to be telling them to advance. Hajime who judged that even if he questioned him he wouldn’t be getting any answers, he nodded at Teio and them and went towards the location. Then, at that moment, the rubble began to levitate and the ground underneath it began to shine faintly. If you looked, one of the crests of the great labyrinth was carved there.



[…..You’re one of the…..Liberators?]



As Hajime voiced his question, simultaneously the light that the ground emitted wrapped Hajime and them. And in the next instant, Hajime’s group were standing in a completely unknown strange space. It wasn’t that big. The room was painted lustrously black, a magic formation was drawn in the center, and there was an antique book on the pedestal by its side. It appears that they’ve suddenly reached the final room of the labyrinth.



Hajime and them walked towards the magic formation. Hajime grabbed Aiko’s hand who had a “?” floating over her head and led her, while nodding to Teio for a moment they stepped into the magic formation.



Then, it wasn’t the usual feeling, their memories were being examined, there was a sense of something going deeper inside, and the 3 people instinctively let out a groan. It was a very uncomfortable sensation, for a moment, they thought it was a trap, but in the next moment it completely cleared up. And, were they recognized as people who’s completed other labyrinths, the knowledge of magic was implanted directly into their heads.



[…..Spirit Magic?]



[U~mu. It appears to be magic that can directly interfere with souls]



[I see. The reason how Miredi’s soul survived and was directly implemented into a golm was this….]



To the experience of knowledge being carved directly into the head suddenly, Aiko was crouched down holding her head, After Hajime noded with a consent face, they approached the pedestal by the side and picked up the book.



It appears that the contents were notes written by Rouse Byrne*pronounced Ban* who was the founder of the [Kamiyama] great labyrinth. It explained practically the same thing that Oscar Orcus had, the liberators exchanges up until he died at [Kamiyama].



However, because Hajime wasn’t interested in it, he quickly skipped through it. He didn’t care about Rouse Byrne’s life. Why did he only leave himself with an image body, he probably could have lived like Miredei by using Spirit Magic, although the reason was explained during the confession, he was through*as in done with the subject*.



And, the last section was describing the conditions to capturing the labyrinth, according to it, when the image body of Rouse Byrne appears as the guide, it would mean that you’ve pretty much been accepted.



Because the image body required at least 2 or more proofs of capturing great labyrinths, also having no faith in god, or overcoming some kind of influence that god’s power acted on in order to appear. In other words, it appears that [Kamiyama’s] concept, was to possess a firm will that wouldn’t bow down to god.



That was probably it but, originally, if you challenged the proper route, it may have been possible to be accepted by the will. Aiko had been accepted, Although she received quite a lot of teachings from the church for a long time, because her feelings for her students were much higher than faith, or maybe it was enough that she had the judgement to go against the church.



For the people of this world, it was a rather harsh condition but, it was an easy condition for Hajime and them.



At last, Aiko who recovered from the shock of obtaining Age of Gods magic is encouraged, and they took the ring from the pedestal along with the book, they then quickly left the place. Once again, Rouse Byrne’s crest shined and they returned back to their original place.



[Sensei, are you alright?]



[U~u, yes. somehow…..even so, such amazing magic…..certainly, if there’s such incredible magic then, there might also be magic that sends us back to Japan]



Aiko nodded as she consented and was massaging her temple. Her expression was of someone who was tired from the rough events that developed within several days and had finally ended, she loosened up when the possibility of returning was truely felt.



[Well then, we know the place where the magic formation is now, lets quickly join up with Yue and them]



[A~, that’s right! The Kingdom is being attacked right? I hope everyone’s safe…..]



With a worried expression Aiko clenched her chest as she prayed, then they began to descend from the mountain. Though I say that, the only way down from [Kamiyama] to the Kingdom was to jump through the lift.



Aiko’s Scream was echoing as she experienced free-falling, Hajime and Teio are through though. With Aiko on his shoulder Hajime and them landed on the ground and, disregarding the flames and screams of the Kingdom which Aiko had a skeptical expression towards and they decided to first go to where Kaori and them were.



And, what they saw when they joined up……



With a sword thrust through the chest, Kaori’s figure had already ceased breathing.





Chapter 105




Going back in time a little. Precisely when Ririana and them arrived in the Royal Palace.



Pakyaa~aaaaan!



[Tsu!? Just what is-!?]



Towards the unpleasant sound of glass being broken, Shizuku Yaegashi who was sleeping in her room quickly jumped into alert mode and got out of her bed sheets while grabbing onto her black katana which was beside her pillow. It was clearly the movements of a person who continues being cautious of their surroundings even while resting.



[…….]



For a while, Shizuku hid her breathing with a stern expression and was ready to draw her katana at any moment, however there were no abnormalities within her room so she leaked out a sigh of relief.



The reason why Shizuku was releasing this kind of alertness was because over the past several days, there were absolutely no signs or sightings of Ririana or Aiko.



Even for some time before that, she noticed a sense of incongruity within the Royal Palace. On that day, the day when Aiko returned, she disappeared after announcing that she had something important to tell them at dinner time, due to this shizuku suspected that something bad had happened to Aiko in order to silence her.



Naturally, she searched for the two missing peoples whereabouts, though they were told that Aiko and them were just being questioned by the head of the church, Ishtar, at the main temple, she wasn’t allowed to meet them directly. In addition they even forcefully avoided her by declaring to Shizuku that they would be released in a few days, moreover, Ririana’s father, King Erihido also said to not worry about them, she could do nothing but withdraw reluctantly for the time being.



However, even then her vague anxiety didn’t disappear, just like now, when going to bed she was vigilant and cautious like a spy.



When Shizuku soundlessly got off her bed, she quickly straightened up her equipment in a few seconds and carefully left the room. Since Kaori decided to travel with Hajime, Shizuku was the only person in the room now. When she confirmed that there were no abnormalities within the corridor, she immediately knocked on Kouki and Ryutaro’s door which was opposite to hers.



The door opened immediately and Kouki’s appearance was seen. Ryutaro was in the back of the room and seemed to be fully awake. It appears that they’ve also woken up like Shizuku due to the loud sound a while ago.



[Kouki, please have more caution. To suddenly open the door…..wouldn’t it be troublesome if it was an assailant? *unsure of this line, ????????????????*]



Shizuku’s eyebrows drop a little when Kouki opened the door without any caution and warned him. On the other hand, Kouki had an astonished expression. Even though he heard the breaking sound, he didn’t think that there would be any immediate dangers in the corridors of the Royal Palace. It appears that he wasn’t fully awake yet.



These past several days, Shizuku had a sense of incongruity within the Royal Palace and about Aiko and them, [Something is wrong, keep your guard up], is what she continually said but, Kouki and Ryutaro thought she was thinking too much about it and didn’t take it seriously.



[More importantly, Shizuku. What was that a while ago? It sounded like something was breaking……]



[……I don’t know. Anyways, lets wake everyone up and gather information. Whatever it is, I’ve got a bad feeling from it….]



Shizuku only said that and turned around to knock on her classmates doors one after another. Most of the students were gathered for an immediate meeting due to the sudden crashing sound from a while ago. Uneasily, Kouki began to raise his voice as the students began to gather in the corridor looking annoyed that their slumber was disturbed.



Then, at that time, one of the maids that was friends with Shizuku rushed in. She comes from a house which enjoys fencing and had the linage of knights, due to this connection she became intimate with Shizuku.



[Shizuku-sama…..]



[Nia!]



The maid called Nia ran up besides Shizuku while looking like she was in low spirits. It was a shadow of her usual dignified atmosphere, Shizuku remembered the sense of incongruity and raised her eyebrows, but it was overtaken by surprise at the information that Nia brought, her sense of incongruity was completely blown away.



[The first large barrier was broken]



[……What was that?]



Nia plainly tells the truth as Shizuku instinctively asked back.



[The Majinzoku*fixing Ninzoku errors lol* are invading. A huge army was developed on the outskirts of the Kingdom’s capital and their attack broke the large barrier]



[….it can’t be, just how did they…..]



The information was far too unbelieveable, even Shizuku lost her calm and became stunned.



The other classmates were also the same, they began to mutter noisily. The Majinzoku’s army, it was impossible for them to be able to invade the King’s capital without arousing anyones attention, with the large barrier broken it became even harder to take in. It’s unavoidable that they wouldn’t be able to keep calm.



[…..Is only the first barrier of the large barrier broken?]



Within that, with a stern expression Kouki asked Nia. The large barrier that protects the Kingdom was composed of 3 pieces, The first on the outside, second, then third barrier, the third barrier was the strongest as it covered the smallest scale of land out of the others.



[Yes. For now…..however, the first barrier was broken in a single blow. It’s only a matter of time before they topple though everything……]



Towards Nia’s answer, Kouki suggested to everyone that they should help out in repulsing the army.



[Even if just a little we should help buy time. In the meantime the Kingdom’s residents should take shelter, if the army corps and knights are prepared….]



There were few that showed a resolute expression towards Kouki’s words. Shizuku and Ryutaro, Suzu, it was only the front groups such as Nagayama’s party.



The other classmates only had a gloomy look while turning their eyes away. They are the people who have lost their will to stand on the front lines. To suddenly challenge a huge army was only further increasing their hesitation.



Then even if by ourselves, Kouki began to resolute his heart, surprisingly, Eri Nakamura answered.



[Wait, Kouki-kun. Rather than fighting on your own, I think we should quickly join with Meld and them]



[Eri….but]



[Nia-san, the army……how much do we know about them?]



[……they’re roughly 100,000 in strength]



The students all held their breaths when they heard the number.



[Kouki-kun. We can’t suppress them if it’s only us. …..We have to oppose numbers with numbers. Even if we’re stronger than an ordinary person, I think that you should go to the place where you’re most needed. That is, shouldn’t we cooperate side by side with Meld’s group…..]



Although it was from the modest and docile glasses girl Eri, the strength in her eyes wasn’t below that of Kouki and the others. And her opinion was justifiable.



[Un, Suzu is also in favor with Eririn. As expected of Suzu’s Eririn! Those glasses aren’t just for show!]



[Suzu~u……The glasses are unrelated~]



[Fufu, I also agree with Eri. I lost my calm a little there. What about you Kouki?]



Towards the 3 girls opinions, Kouki was hesitating. However, after carefully thinking over Eri’s judgement, Kouki also trusted her quite a bit, in the end, he decided to join up with Meld’s knights and army corps just as Eri said.



Kouki and them began to run towards where the knights and soldiers were mobilizing. No one noticed the smile in the shape of a crescent by their side…….



~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~



When Kouki and them reached the point which was designated as the emergency meeting place, a lot of soldiers and knights have already lined up in an orderly manner, the deputy leader of the knights, José*In case you guys didn’t know it’s pronounced ho-zay* Rankaido, was on the platform and briefing them in a loud voice. While bathing in the moonlight, the soldiers were all standing still with pale and stunned expressions, they just stared at José with no vigor.



Then, José who noticed that Kouki and them just entered the plaza stopped talking and beckons Kouki.



[……Good job coming here. Do you understand the situation?]



[Yes, We’ve heard from Nia already. Ehtto, where’s Meld-san?]



Kouki nodded towards the welcoming words and question of José, and he didn’t see Meld’s appearance as he looked around so he asked about his whereabouts.



[The head is dealing with a few things. More importantly, sa~a, come into the center. The Hero is our leader after all….]



As José said, Kouki and them were guided into the center where the soldiers were lined up. The classmates who stayed behind, [Eh? Us as well?], showed a puzzled expression, while being crowded by silent soldiers they could do nothing but follow Kouki and them.



Passing through the silence, the surrounding soldier’s expressions hardly changed at all too, along with the knights appearances, the feeling of incongruity began to swell up within Shizuku. It was the bad feelings that she felt ever since the beginning when she woke up, Shizuku’s heart was conflicted. Unconsciously, she put power into her hand that was gripping her black kanata.



And when Kouki and them were completely surrounded by the soldiers and knights, José restarted his speech.



[Everyone, the situation draws near. However, there’s nothing to fear. There is no enemies who can stand against us. We do not know defeat. Death shall not strike us. Sa~a, everyone, welcome our Hero. Right now, we exist specifically for this day. Sa~a, take up your swords]



The soldiers and the knights draw out their swords altogether.



[It’s the beginning of the slaughter. Watch closely]



José took something out of his bosom and held it over his head. As instructed, not only the soldiers but also kouki and them payed attention.



And….



Ka!!



Light bursted out.



The thing José was holding shot out bright light which was comparable to Hajime’s flashbang. Kouki and them who were paying attention to it were completely defenseless, they immediately avert their eyes and cover them while releasing a short scream, their sights have been temporarily blocked out by looking straight at the light.



And, in the next instant……



Zuburi~



countless vivid sounds ring out.



[Agu~?]



[Ga~a!]



[Gufu~!?]



Following that, muffled screams were heard from many places.



The screams were different from the ones caused by the light a while ago. It was the voice that leaked out when in agony and pain. Then immediately afterwards, there was the sound of countless people falling onto the ground ~Dosa Dosa~.



Inside that, only Shizuku understood the cause. After entering the open space, her caution was raised to the maximum. She felt a sense of incongruity within José’s speech. Thats why, immediately when the flash of light exploded, she took up a defensive stance without being shaken and immediately after that she was able to block the assassin’s blade with her black kanata. It was likely the gift of training that allowed her to only rely on the presence she felt while her eyes were blinded.



And, after the light settled down, Shizuku began to look around her surroundings as her sight began to recover, every single one of her classmates were pierced in the back by the knights and soldiers swords and being held down onto the ground.



[Wha, this…..]



They raised their groaning voices as they were knocked down and suppressed from above, furthermore, looking at her classmates appearances that had swords in their backs, Shizuku’s voice was stuck in her throat. It can’t be, she began to imagine the worst outcome that they were all dead but, it appears that everyone was just barely alive as they all raised out voices in agony.



Although she was slightly relieved when knowing that, Shizuku turned a stern glance towards the surrounding soldiers in the unpredictable situation, a strange scene was reflected within the mesh of the crowd and she unintentionally stiffened up.



[Ara-ra, should I say that it was as expected? …….Ne~e, Shizuku?]



[Eh? Eh…..what are you-!?]



Right, while all other classmates were in critical condition on the ground, there was only 1 other student that was calmly standing. That student was completely different from their usual self, with a glutinous voice they talked to Shizuku. Since their atmosphere changed too much, Shizuku’s questions and doubts were stuck in her throat.



In that moment, once again, a knight thrusted out their sword towards Shizuku’s back.



[Ku!?]



While being shaken up by the other persons sudden change, Shizuku was barely able to dodge and turned towards the student with an amazed glance.



[You also dodged this huh…..really, Shizuku is troublesome huh?]



[What are you sa-!?]



Further increasing in intensity, the soldiers and knights join in and thrust their swords out. Shizuku surpassed them all then suddenly turned her gaze as her name was called out.



[Shizuku-sama! Help……]



[Nia!]



There the appearance of Nia was thrown on the ground with a knight on top of her and a sword about to stab into her. Shizuku immediately arrived nearby Nia’s location in an instant with her high-speed movement skill “No Rhythm”, she swung her sheath at the knight who was on top of Nia and blew him away.



[Nia, are you alright?]



[Shizuku-sama……]



While supporting up Nia who was on the ground, Shizuku looked around her surroundings in caution.



Towards that Shizuku, Nia murmurs and clings both hands around her.



And,



……A dagger was stabbed into Shizuku’s back.



[Agu~!? Ni, Nia? Wh, why…….]



[……………]



With an expression like she couldn’t believe what happened and grimacing over the acute pain running through her back, Shizuku looked down at Nia who was clinging to her.



Her expression no longer had the cheerful look nor the familiarity it once held, she only returned Shizuku’s glance expressionlessly back at her.



Shizuku finally noticed it at last. At first, she thought Nia’s state was due to the Kingdom being invaded, however that wasn’t it, her atmosphere was almost identical to the expressionless knights and soldiers which surrounded her, there was definitely a different reason for this.



Nia held onto Shizuku’s arm and twisted it as she pinned her down onto the ground, she then attached shackles which sealed her magic just like all the other students had.



[Ahahaha, as expected even for Shizuku, surely you didn’t think that that child would turn against you? Un un, that’s probably right? That’s why I purposely took time to prepare it?]



With scorching pain running through her back and gritting her teeth on the cold ground, Shizuku realized that something was done to the soldiers and Nia. And although she didn’t want to admit it, the disastrous scene that unfolded before her, right now, she called out to her close friend who had an unusually unpleasant smirk on her face.



[What does this…mean…..Eri]



Right, that person who was modest and quiet, attentive and kind-hearted, Shizuku and their trusted companion which they shared their joys and sorrow with, it was that person, Eri Nakamura.



Even while sustaining severe injuries, the students who were targeted and still alive could do nothing but have an expression filled with agony, they watched Eri’s expression as she walked calmly and steadily through the soldiers in a grand manner.



Rather than answering Shizuku’s question, Eri began to laugh oddly in amusement as she moves towards Kouki. And after taking off her glasses, she pulls on the magic sealing collar which was placed on Kouki’s neck with an attractive smile.



[E, Eri….Just….what…gu….happened…..]



Although not to the extent of Shizuku and them who were his childhood friends, Eri who was one of his companions and close friend had a far too different atmosphere around her, Kouki desperately questions her while enduring the pain of the sword which ran through his body. However, Eri had a delirious expression which contained heat within it and disregarded Kouki’s question.



Then,



[Aha, Kouki-kun, I~caught~you~]



while saying so, she placed her lips on top of Kouki’s. Within the strange silence which surrounded the area, a vivid sound of water lapping could be heard. Eri was crazily releasing her emotions as if she had been saving it up for years towards Kouki.



Although Kouki couldn’t understand what was going on, he was desperately trying to shake free but, he was suppressed by several people, along with the magic sealing collar, like all the other students he also had his hands and feet bound as well, moreover his power was sapped from him as there was a sword thrust through his body.



Was she finally satisfied, Eri separated her lips while creating a silver thread. Then, with and ecstatic expression in her eyes she licked her lips and started to stand up slowly, she then glared at the students who were being held down and bleeding. Absentminded expressions as well as agonized expressions were lined up. When she saw such a spectacle she nodded in satisfaction, her eyes stopped towards Shizuku and she smiled.



[Ma~a, these kinds of things. Shizuku]



[~…..What do you mean….Kofu~….]



With an expression which showed she didn’t understand, Shizuku vomited blood as she glared at Eri, Eri shook her head with an expression that said, my bad, and began to talk about the reason as if she was talking to a baby.



[U~n, you don’t know huh? You see, I’ve always wanted Kouki-kun. That’s why, I did what was necessary to obtain him. It’s as simple as that]



[……If you liked Kouki then…if you’d confessed then…this kind of thing…]



Towards Shizuku’s rebuttal, for a moment Eri’s becomes expressionless. However, she began to talk and returned a smirk immediately again.



[It’s useless, useless, use~less. Confessing is useless. Kouki-kun’s kind-hearted so there’s no way he’d see someone else as special. Even if there’s only garbage with no value around his surroundings, he wouldn’t leave them alone because he’s too kind-hearted. That’s why, in order to make Kouki-kun mine only, I have to work hard and get rid of all the garbage in the surroundings]



You can’t even understand that? as Eri shrugs her shoulders like it was a foolish thing. Although they were Being called garbage, they didn’t have much anger as they were too surprised at the sudden change. For the person in front of her to have changed this much, honestly, Shizuku looked at the girl as if this was the first time they’ve met.



[Fufu, it was good that we were sent to a different world. In Japan, it would have been truly difficult to clean up the garbage, it was harsh living there. Of course, I won’t allow us to be sent back after this war is over. Along with Kouki-kun, the both of us will continue living here for ever~and~ever~]



While looking at the laughing and giggling Eri, a sudden impossible guess came into Shizuku’s mind and she unintentionally voiced it out.



[…It can’t be…the reason the large barrier…broke so easily was because…..]



[Ahaha, so you’ve noticed? Right, It was me. I told them to break the artifact maintaining the large barrier]



It appears that Shizuku’s worst case scenario was spot on. The reason why the Majinzoku was able to arrive at the outskirts of the Kingdom without being spotted and easily breaking through the large barrier, everything was due to Eri. Eri’s line of sight was interestly looking at the soulless soldiers and knights that were standing by her side, she would probably let them do it.



[If I killed you guys, I wouldn’t be able to stay in the Kingdom any longer…..That’s why you see, I contacted the Majinzoku, guiding the Kingdom to destruction through the people from another world*This line’s iffy, ???????????????*, I’ll send the knights which I turned into puppets to the devil’s lands as tributes, then it’ll only be me and Kouki-kun left around]



[Impossible…to contact the Majinzoku…]



Kouki somehow recovered from the shock of the kiss, he muttered with an expression which that showed he couldn’t believe it. Eri had been training together with them at the Kingdom for a long time. Inside of the large barrier the Majinzoku wouldn’t be able to get in, it shouldn’t be possible to contact them, he began rebutting out poor arguments while trying to believe in Eri.



However, Eri easily shatters his hopes.



[The Majinzoku woman who attacked us at [Orcus Great Labyrinth]. While leaving I quickly did it, Necromancy that is? As I expected, the Majinzoku came to recover her body, so I used it. From that situation, I definitely got cold feet. If what I proposed was rejected and I was murdered instead…..unintentionally, I had used Necromancy…..I didn’t want to be doubted so I showed my necromancy to increase their impressions…..ma~a, in the end everything was alright….]



According to Eri’s words, she performed Necromancy on the Majinzoku woman, and left a message for the Majinzoku who would come and look for her since she didn’t return. Due to this, Mikhail had known how Cattleya had died. In addition, she communicated with the Majinzoku through a suitable “human’s” dead body.



When Eri’s story was heard, Shizuku remembered about Eri’s Necromancy and her face which was already pale from blood loss became even paler.



Necromancy was magic which acts on residual thoughts(. . . .)of the corpse. She concealed the fact that she could actually use it perfectly. If that’s so, all the knights and soldiers who looked soulless that were surrounding Shizuku and them, the worst possible situation came to her mind when she thought about Nia who was holding her down.



[The reason…for these guys…appearances is…..]



[Of course it’s because of Necromancy~. Everyone is already dead~. Ahahahahahaha!]



Shizuku grit her teeth as she was told the cruel answer and a desperate rebuttal was voiced.



[…That’s a lie…the undead…cannot talk back…….They shouldn’t…be able to!]



[Look, that’s because of my ability? Through some memory and thought patterns during their lifetime being added in they became able to talk. It was my original through Necromancy “Bind Soul” I guess? Ah, even then the sense of incongruity remains huh. I wasn’t able to carry through with everything within a day, there I began to worry about what to do…..one day, a person offered their cooperation. A beautifully silver haired person. I was surprised that my plan was found out, in that instant, I prepared my resolution for various things…..It wasn’t certain that I was being accused at the time, although I couldn’t trust them I could at least take advantage of them instead~]



Really, in such a hurry~, Eri pretended to be wiping away her sweat. Most likely, there might have been various processes which had to take place, but she didn’t show any signs of explaining them out.



[Actually, I accidentally got my hands on the King’s close aid so I’m great right? In return he became like a dangerous drugged person though. Ma~a, thanks to that I was able to quickly push forward my plans. Kufufu, it’s alright! I won’t waste everyone’s deaths. I’ll properly~, recycle them and allow the Majinzoku to use them!]



Originally, they only act on residual thoughts through necromancy, but if you take in the consideration of the dead person’s intent while still alive, the residual thought’s would be coated in magic as they’re brought back to life, they’ll move exactly as the magician wants, alternatively in a way where techniques are used to possess a corpse and make it do the magicians bidding.



Their performance is normal, it’s uncompared to while they’re alive, they won’t move unless directed since they have no thinking ability of their own. Of course, if you give an order like “Keep attacking” they’ll continue, they’re able to keep moving even without detailed instructions.



In other words, when Nia and José talked with Shizuku and them, they had no ability to think, it should be impossible through necromancy. That’s why there was a sense of incongruity, the technique which Eri called “Bind Soul”, it’s a technique which adds memory and thought patterns of thinking into the corpse through extracting the remains of the spirit.



This was basically an ability to interfere with the soul. That is, Eri managed to work hard and step into the realm of the Age of God’s magic on her own. Definitely a cheat, she often said that she was unsuited for Necromancy, that amount of studying and genius-class talent is definitely something that deserves astonishment. Alternatively, it may be due to her immense drive towards her obsession.



By the way, the reason why Eri didn’t immediately kill her classmates was because “Bind Soul” could only be used once at a time immediately after death.



[Gu~u…stop it…Eri! If you do those things…..I…..]



[Won’t forgive me? Ahaha, I thought you’d say so. Kouki-kun is kind-hearted right. Besides, no matter how much garbage I clean up….that’s why, I’ll also properly use “Bind Soul” on Kouki-kun, I’ll be able to turn you into mine? No one elses, only looking at me, carrying out my every wish! Only my Kouki-kun! A~a, a~a! Just imagining it makes me feel like cuming!]



Eri began to embrace herself and writhe her body with a nympholeptic expression. There was no longer the appearance of the calm girl who was in the book committee. All the classmate’s thought. She’s gone insane. “Bind Soul” was a skill specifically made to ease and further increase the Necromancer’s convenience in giving out instructions, however there is no change that a puppet is only a puppet. Once you understood that, still, she didn’t seem to mind that kind of Kouki.



[Lies….that’s a lie! Uu, Eririn is, th….there’s no way Eri would do this! …surely….something… right….she’s only being manipulated! Come to your senses Eri!]



Suzu who was Eri’s best friend shouted out with a distorted expression while panting in pain. She was scratching at the grounds with her hands as if she was trying to crawl towards Eri. Eri turned towards Suzu and looked her straight in the eye with a smile. And she slowly walked towards the closest person who was laying on the ground, Kondo Reiichi.



Kondo possibly felt a bad premonition, [Hi~], he let out a scream while trying to get even a little bit further away from Eri who was approaching. Naturally, he was perfectly held down, the only thing he could do was scream as his magic was sealed as well.



Eri who came besides Kondo which caused him to once again tremble with fear, and gave him a smile. Kouki and them were raising their voices, [Stop!] [Stop it!].



[St, stop!? Ga~a, ah, agua…]



Kondo’s muffled screams began to break out. The sword was once again stabbed into Kondo’s back but this time, where his heart was. For a little while, though Kondo struggled and showed tenacity because of his strong status, his movements quickly became feeble, and…..he stopped moving altogether.



Eri placed her hands on Kondo and began to mutter a chant. After she completed the chant and muttered the magic name “Bind Soul”, a semitransparent Kondo overlapped with his own corpse.



Just after that, the knight who was holding down Kondo got up and moved back one step. Kouki and them were waiting anxiously, Kondo whose heart should have been destroyed, slowly lifted his body up, he stood up with a soulless expression just like the surrounding soldiers and knights.



[Yes~. One puppet’s been completed~]



Eri’s bright voice resounded as the other students looked at Kondo with surprise as he stood still silently and expressionlessly. Just now, one person was finally killed, towards the scene of death they couldn’t even voice out their thoughts.



[E, Eri….why…..]



Towards Suzu who voiced out a question with a shocked expression, Eri voiced out the worst possible conclusion.



[Ne~e, Suzu? Thank you? Japan and even here, you were very convenient to use to stay nearby Kouki-kun?]



[……Eh?]



[I give up? The atmosphere between Kouki-kun as he was around Shizuku and Kaori was too much. If you approached carelessly, other women would drill holes into you…..because we had no powers on that side, it was a matter of time before you’d self-destruct for getting close. In that respect, I was thankful for Suzu’s existence. You seemed to be bright no matter how foolishly used and exposed you were? Even if I approached Kouki and them no one would complain about it. Thats why, the position of “Suzu Tanimura’s best friend” was truly convenient. Thanks to you, I was able to stay close to Kouki-kun over on the other side and even when in a different world we got to be in the same party….. un, Suzu was really~ convenient! That’s why, thank you!]



[……Ah, uu, ah…..]



From the shock of Eri’s confession, the sounds of something breaking within Suzu ranged out. Suzu learned that her best friend which she had been together with and believed in all the time, was nothing more than a fantasy. Even the light of the escapism within her eye disappeared.



[Eri~! You’re-!]



Towards the overboarding words, Shizuku yelled out in anger. Nia who was turned into a puppet pulled up Shizuku’s head by her hair and pounded it onto the ground. However, as if she was stating, what about it, Shizuku’s eyes flared up in anger.



[Fufu, you’re angry huh? That expression that you’ve got is very good. I extremely hated you. Your face fit in so naturally besides Kouki-kun and even your eyes carried a sense of condescending attitude, I hated everything about you. That’s why, for you in particular, I’ll be giving you a special role]



[….a role….you say?]



[Kufu, ne~e? What kind of feelings would you have for killing your best friend after finally meeting together after a long time?]



From those words, Shizuku’s eyes opened widely as she guessed what Eri was planning to do.



[…It can’t be, Kaori!?]



As if saying, You did well!, Eri began clapping her hands together with a smirk on her lips. While using Shizuku as a puppet, Eri was going to try and murder Kaori.



[It was alright to just leave her with Nagumo but…..there’s a person who said, I would love to have that person as a puppet! I had been helped in various ways, so I decided to give them their reward. I’m someone who goes through with their promises after all! I’m such a good woman right?]



[Quit joking around! Gofu~…aguu~a!?]



While enraged, Shizuku who tried to move only managed to voluntarily enlarge the wound which was inflicted on her, Nia’s blade sunk further in.



[Aha, is it painful? hurts? I’m kind-hearted so. Right now, I’ll relieve you of your pain…..]



This time it appears to be Shizuku’s turn, with a smirking smile she compromised. Kouki and them desperately tried to resist as an illusion of Shizuku becoming a puppet like Kondo came into their minds.



Kouki’s resistance in particular was much more intense, while desperately raising his voice, cracks began to appear on the 5 magic sealing shackles which were on him. Did he use “Limit Breakthrough” and “Supremacy Dispersal*Probably wrong but I’m keeping it lol, ??*”, terrifying pressure began to overflow from his body.



However, the knights whose brain limiters were removed showed extreme strength uncomparable towards their lifetime and perfectly held down his joints, it wasn’t possible to immediately shake them off. Kouki’s expression became crossed with despair.



Shizuku was desperately focused her conscious which was fainting because of the amount of blood she was losing, she decided that until the final moment, she would continue staring directly into Eri’s eyes with fierce anger until she averted her eyes.



At that, Eri looked down on her with a smirk on her lips, did she want to perform the last rites herself in the end, she received a sword from a nearby knight.



[See you later then? Shizuku. Pretending to be your friend seemed to make me want to puke?]



Though Shizuku was staring at Eri, inside of her heart she was looking towards her best friend. Although she knows it’ll likely not reach her, still, thinking about the tragedy that was to come in the future, she gave her prayers to her best friend who was on a trip somewhere in the world.



(I’m sorry, Kaori. The next time we meet, please do not trust me…..stay alive…..obtain happiness…..)



The knights sword which was invertedly held in her hand reflected the moonlight and shined. And, as if driving a wooden stake into a vampire, the sharp tip of the sword was brought down quickly towards Shizuku’s heart.



While watching the approaching danger, Shizuku prayed. Please allow my best friend to survive, please allow her to obtain happiness. Although I’ll be going on ahead, the dead me would end up hurting you, but because he is near you I’m sure you’ll be alright. Live strongly, gain happiness with your beloved person….please…..



Fadingly, the world began to pass by slowly within Shizuku’s mind within that moment. Ah, this is my life flashing before my eyes….finally, Shizuku began to think that the sword would now pierce through, her life



……….was not taken.



[Eh?]



[Eh?]



Eri’s voice sounded out along with Shizuku’s.



The knights sword which Eri brought down was stopped by a barrier which was the size of a palm. The two who were completely stunned at what had happen, heard the voice of someone which should not have been there. Being driven into a corner, the voice was full of impatience. It was the person who Shizuku was wishing happiness for, her best friend’s voice. [Shizuku-chan!]





Chapter 106




[Shizuku-chan!]



Along with the voice, before she noticed 10 shining barriers were created and protected her. And within those, there were also lights which cut in between Nia and Eri that bursted out! Should it have been called, barrier burst or something, it was a technique which makes the magical power contained within the barriers go out of control and bursts out light as well as letting loose the remains of the barrier.



[~!?]



Eri immediately covered her face with both of her arms but, she was blown back after flinching due to the bright light which caused her to lose her balance as the remains of the barrier rammed into her.



Nia who was holding down Shizuku was also similarly blown back. Although she immediately got back up to try and restrain Shizuku, before that, a rope of light grew out from the ground and bounded her.



Shizuku was completely dumbfounded at the current situation and turned towards the voice which called out her name.



And from within the gaps of the knights who were surrounding them, she caught the appearance of her best friend which shouldn’t have been here. It was not an illusion. Kaori was definitely looking at Shizuku with a grief expression. Surely with the sight of Shizuku and everyone elses tragic state, being able to just barely make it in time has allowed her eyes to loosen up in relief.



[Ka, Kaori……]



[Shizuku-chan! Wait for a bit! I’ll help you right away!]



Kaori’s voice sounded out desperately towards Shizuku and them who were surrounded by soldiers as she appeared from the entrance of the plaza. Then, she quickly started chanting full-heal recovery magic. It was the first-class recovery magic of the light system, “Sacred Text”. From her classmate’s current state and the situation, she judged that she should quickly heal all members.



[~!? Why are you here! You guys sure are set on getting in my way!]



Eri gave out orders to the knights as her face distorted in anger. The knights all attacked Kaori together in order to stop her chant.



However, Kaori was not hurt, the swords that the knights were wielding were stopped by a barrier of light.



[Everyone! What exactly happened! Return to your senses! Eri! What exactly does this mean!?]



Having protected Kaori who was chanting the first-class recovery magic, Ririana soon appeared right behind Kaori. A sphere-like barrier wrapped around Kaori and herself in order to defend themselves.



Ririana was extremely confused as the situation was that the knights and soldiers were trying to kill Kouki and them and they were also following Eri’s commands. While placing up the barrier she called out to question Eri. However Eri wasn’t listening at all.



Ririana’s techniques were definitely of the higher class. Being able to cover an entire caravan in a barrier and holding out against the attacks of over 40 bandits. That’s why, even if the knights delivered severe attacks with their limiters removed, it was definitely capable of holding out until Kaori’s chant was finished.



And, because Eri understood that, her expression showed impatience.



[Chi, it can’t be helped I guess?]



Was it because of impatience? Eri gave up on turning her classmates into puppets and decided to kill them all off before they were healed.



Then, at that time, suddenly before Ririana’s eyes, one of the knights who brandished his sword against the barrier was beheaded and collapsed onto the ground.



The one who appeared behind the fallen knight was……Daisuke Hiyama.



[Shirasaki! Princess Ririana! Are you alright!]



[Hiyama-san? With such an awful wound, you-!?]



Ririana’s face turned pale as she saw Hiyama’s state. Although her chant wasn’t interrupted, Kaori’s eyes also opened up widely. That was to be expected as Hiyama’s chest was drenched in blood. No matter how you looked at it, he had desperately and recklessly tried to escape from his restraints.



He shook violently and staggered, Ririana quickly removed part of the barrier and allowed Hiyama who had his hand placed on the barrier, inside. With a thump, Hiyama fell down. However in that moment, Shizuku’s impatient shout resounded out.



[Don’t! Get away from him!]



She warned them desperately while vomiting out blood. Shizuku had noticed. Why was only Hiyama able to break out of the restraints when even Kouki couldn’t and who was the person that Eri talked about who wanted Kaori…….It was clear that Ririana’s barrier would stay in place until Kaori’s chant was finished. Despite all that, the only person who would pretend to help out…..



[Kya~aa!?]



[Agu~u!?]



Shizuku’s warning was not on time.



Ririana’s barrier disappeared, what was seen there was the appearance of Ririana who was embracing Kaori’s back closely had been knocked down onto the ground and a sword ran through Kaori’s chest.



[Kaoriiii–!]



Shizuku’s scream echoed out.



With an crazed look in his eyes, Hiyama had embraced Kaori’s back closely with his face buried onto her neck. What was in his hands behind Kaori was obviously a sword which pierced through her heart.



Hiyama was never injured in the first place. He had been pretending while preparing in the case that Kouki’s explosive powers as the hero allows him to break free. And though he was surprised at Kaori’s and Ririana’s appearance, he judged that at the rate things were going, Kouki and them would get healed and decided to act.



[Hihi~, finally, I’ve finally obtained it. …..As expected, I’m better than Nagumo? Yeah, that’s right? Na~a, Shirasa….no, Kaori? Na~a? Gihi~, oi, Nakamura, hurry up already. The contract]



Eri shrugged her shoulders towards Hiyama’s words. And in order to place “Bind Soul” onto Kaori she approached.



Right afterwards, a scream resounded out.



[Gaa~aaaa! You guys–!!]



Kouki was. Desperately trying to break out of the restraints even as his body creaked as his anger was at his boiling point. He had thought that Kaori had been killed and seems to have lost himself. The cracks on the 5 magic sealing shackles began to gradually grow larger. It was extraordinary strength. However, it was still not enough to be released from the knight’s restraints.



Then, as Hiyama relaxed as he saw that, a low muttered voice could be heard in his ear. If you looked, it was Kaori who was muttering even after receiving a fatal wound. Hiyama became anxious and brought his ear closer to her mouth. And what he heard was……



[———–at…the…end of….the…year, I…smile…”Sacred…Text”]



Even with a mortal wound, she completed the first-class magic. Kaori’s magic was casted through will power. Hiyama’s eyes were opened wide in astonishment.



Kaori herself should have realized that a fatal wound was inflicted onto her. Despite it all, till the last breath what she muttered were not cries of lament, nor calling out the name of a precious person…..she decided to fight.



Kaori had thought about it. He, the person who she fell for, no matter the situation and no matter the opponent, he fought without giving up. If so then, she who wished to stand next to him could not expose such ungracefulness. And with barely any consciousness left, with just her strong desires to finish chanting the magic, it has definitely been completed in exchange for her life.



Ripples of light began to spread out from Kaori. In the blink of an eye it ran throughout the plaza and resulted as a powerful heal for those that were injured. The swords were being pushed out by the healing light. For some reason the puppet’s movements also became more dull.



Naturally, the light of healing also affected Kaori, though the wound was being healed, the injury that Kaori received was through a vital place unlike the others. Moreover, as the wound was closing up Hiyama frantically gouged into her wound and she wasn’t healed at all. With that, Kaori was certain to die.



[Ahhhhhhh!!]



Kouki’s scream gushed out.



With his body healed he could perform at his best, with that the shackles that were already cracked were all destroyed as if they were fragile things. At the same time, pure-white light radiated intensely from his body, expressing his anger. With the intense torrent of light, Kouki had raised his stats by a magnitude of 5. It was the final derivation of “Limit Breakthrough”, “Supremacy Dispersal”.



[I’ll never…..forgive you guys!]



Although the knights were trying to restrain Kouki, Kouki easily snatches the sword of the knight which stabbed him and easily cut the puppet into two. Then, held out his hand to retrieve his sacred sword which was taken from him, the sacred sword rotated throughout the air and flew into Kouki’s hand.



Eri was expressionless, puppet soldiers were rushing at him but Kouki easily cut them into two. He shouldn’t be able to overcome the feelings of murder. However, right now with the intense fury of losing a comrade, he recognized that his opponents were already dead so there was no hesitation in his sword.



On the other hand, the front-lines group gathered around the other classmates and the fight to protect the stay-behind group began. No matter how many they took down they were still surrounded once again by puppet soldiers, there was also no time to remove the magic sealing shackles so their fight was based purely on physical strength. Ryutaro and Nagayama literally became a meat wall, they desperately tried to protect the stay-behind group which were trembling.



Shizuku desperately attempted to get to Kaori’s place with a tearful expression. However, just like Ryutaro and them she was still in shackles, waves of puppet soldiers attacked and she wasn’t able to easily advance ahead.



At that time, Kouki had finally beaten the puppet soldiers which surrounded him. With an angered look, Kouki glared angrily at Hiyama and Eri and quickly advanced.



But, there, Eri’s trump card which took advantage of Kouki’s weak point appeared. As a result, just as Eri predicted, Kouki’s sword stopped.



Kouki called out towards that trump card in a shaking voice.



[It, it can’t be…..even…Meld-san…..]



Right, the reason why Kouki’s sword stopped in its place was because it was Meld Roginsu, leader of the knights.



[……Kouki…why, are you pointing your sword at me…I didn’t teach you such things…]



[Na~…Meld-san…..I]



[Kouki! Don’t listen! Meld-san has already-!]



Shizuku’s voice scolded at Kouki who was shaken. When he regained his senses, Meld’s sword was already approaching. Immediately he used his sacred sword to receive the blow. Along with the terrific shockwave, Kouki legs shook*probably wrong but I think it’s somewhat close? ????????????*. It appears that the kingdom’s strongest knight has had his limiter removed.



[……Meld-san……I’m sorry!]



Although Kouki’s expression twisted in sorrow, he swung his sacred sword in intense waves towards Meld. Even while dead, Meld’s swordsmanship was still great, he barely managed to get by Kouki’s attacks while he used “Supremacy Dispersal”. Because of Meld’s appearance, Kouki’s boiling head had cooled down a little, his sword attacks which ignored feelings of murder began to dull. However, even still Meld shouldn’t be able to beat the current Kouki, finally Meld’s sword was flung away.



Kouki instantly closed in and side swept at Meld’s neck with his sacred sword.



But, before the sacred sword dug into Meld’s neck,



[……..Help me…..Kouki]



[~!?]



Kouki’s sword stopped unintentionally after hearing Meld’s words. Even though it might be impossible, maybe, Meld might not have actually been killed and is only being manipulated? Isn’t it still possible to help him? He was unable to throw away such thoughts.



This was Kouki’s weak point. In short, it was half-heartedness. If you’re going to help, then help. If you’re going to kill, then kill. You can choose either one but resolution and determination are needed. Kouki had none of that. Based on the information presented to him, a convenient interpretation of the situation occured. That’s why, though he usually doesn’t doubt his righteousness, he loses himself at the most crucial times.



Meld used his foot to bounce up the knights sword which was on the ground. In an instant with the hand which gripped the sword, he once again crossed swords with Kouki. However, Kouki didn’t have the overwhelming drive from awhile ago, rather Meld was the one who was pushing.



[~!? Gaha~!]



After somehow managing through Meld’s attacks, Kouki’s body lost its strength and his knees gave out. It was not due to the time limit of “Supremacy Dispersal”. That much time hasn’t passed by yet. The incident didn’t stop with just that, finally he even began to vomit out loads of blood. The blood soaked into the ground and Kouki’s confusion increased greatly.



[Fuu~, it’s finally kicking in. It was quite the strong poison….as expected of Kouki-san. If I didn’t prepare Meld-san I would have lost]



Towards Eri’s relaxed voice, Kouki desperately tried to support up his body with a questionable expression.



[Kufufu, with the cause of the prince kissing the princess, if the princess kisses the prince he’ll fall into a slumber (Killed) and become hers…..there’s that kind of development as well right? Ma~a, even I have some preparations in case of emergencies~]



With those words Kouki had realised. The kiss that Eri gave him in the beginning. In that moment, she likely made both of them take in poison. Eri herself may have taken the antidote earlier. He never would have thought that he’d be fed poison through mouth-to-mouth. Let alone being able to imagine what someone in love would do. Kouki once again was reminded of the fact that the Eri that everyone had known was nowhere to be seen.



With the poisons effects, Kouki was completely unable to move, Eri laughed out satisfyingly and then turned around to walk towards Kaori once again. Because soon the time limit for “Bind Soul” will be over. Hiyama demanded Eri with an ogre-like form.



Kaori was dead and about to be defiled. With that Kouki and Shizuku were both furious with anger, and with a regretting expression Shizuku was about to charge straight in.



However, Eri had already placed her hand over Kaori. Eri began chanting the spell. After several tens of seconds, the Kaori puppet which will obey all of Hiyama’s words will be completed. Shizuku and their expressions flared up in anger, Hiyama was laughing loudly, and Eri was smiling with a smirk.



Then……a voice which betrayed the battlefield that was filled with despair and betrayal sounded out.



[…….What the heck is going on?]



It was the boy with white hair and an eyepatch, Hajime Nagumo’s voice.



Towards Hajime’s appearance, as if time stopped, everyone’s movements ceased. This was because Hajime’s ferocious pressure was being emitted.



Normally the puppet soldiers which had no emotions shouldn’t have stopped due to Hajime’s pressure being released but, Eri who was their spiritualist was overwhelmed by the natural feeling of the weak instinctively concealing themselves as the strong came around which in turn caused the puppet soldiers to also do the same.



Hajime was completely unphased at the hundreds of eyes gazing at him and he began to check out the surrounding circumstances. A large amount of soldiers and knights were attacking his classmates, his classmates were grouped up and formed a circle, Meld was in front of Kouki who was on the ground and vomiting out blood, pounding her knee with a black katana in one hand was Shizuku, Eri and Hiyama who became stiff, and……Hiyama while embracing onto Kaori was holding onto the sword which secured that Kaori’s life had ceased……



The moment he saw her appearance, an out-of-this-world terrifying presence instantly appeared at the plaza. As if insects were crawling throughout their entire body, inside it felt like their hearts were being clenched directly and left them uncomfortable, they trembled frightenly against the presence. The presence of overwhelming death. It was exactly like their blood had frozen. For an instant their bodies lost its temperature and the heavy murderous intent made them envision their deaths.



In an instant, Hajime’s appearance disappeared.



And Hajime who was moving at a pace which no one could comprehend had appeared besides Kaori with a roaring sound. The roaring sound was caused by Hiyama being flung back and ramming straight into the back wall of the plaza and destroying it. In an instant Hajime had kicked Hiyama in the chest and sent him flying without influencing Kaori at all.



Normally, one blow would be enough to cause Hiyama’s entire body to burst apart, however because he held back a bit it only caused numerous bones to break and damage to the internal organs. By now he should have fainted in the wall, once he wakes up again from the pain, the hell would likely once again begin.



Hajime held up Kaori with one arm and cleared her face of her hair. Then, with a loud voice he called out to his comrade.



[Teio! I’m counting on you!]



[~……Umu, leave it to me!]



[Shi, Shirasaki-san~!]



In response towards Hajime’s request, Teio quickly rushed over towards them. Aiko’s complexion changes as she also came towards Kaori’s side. Once Teio was handed Kaori by Hajime she quickly began chanting.



[Ahaha, it’s useless. She’s already dead. I would have never expected that you guys would be coming here…..no, the moment Kaori appeared I should have noticed. ……Un, it seems like it’s already over for Hiyama, I’ll give it to you? As long as you’re not hostile against me, I’ll bring Kaori back to life with magic for you. It wouldn’t be genuine but, she’ll stay pretty like now? It’s better than rotting right? Ne?]



Radiantly, Eri proposed her suggestion while sweating from her forehead. Disregarding Aiko whose eyes were opened up widely in astonishment by his side, Hajime abruptly got up. Eri who knew of Hajime’s strength, held out her hands as she clicked her tongue secretly while emphasizing that Kaori would just be rotting if left alone.



But, Hajime’s overflowing murderous intent wasn’t shaken one bit, expressionlessly like wearing a Noh mask he slowly walked towards Eri.



[Wait, wait a bit, Nagumo. Come on, look at the surrounding people? There’s not much difference between them and the living? Although it can’t be helped that she’s dead, at the very least I could make her like them? Furthermore, I can create a Kaori that you like? For that you’ll absolutely need me…..]



Eri was rapidly speaking as she backed away.



Then, at that time, a shadow was running up behind Hajime. A blow from a sharp spear which was uncomparable to the other puppet soldiers shot at him. The shadow’s identity was Kondo Reiichi. It was the spear user that was pitifully killed by Eri earlier and turned into a puppet.



To begin with, although I say puppet, it still exhibited the strength of a cheat which came from a different world. The powerful thrust incorporated with Kondo’s class “Spear Master*I think, it might just be spear user? ???*” was spiraling with wind straight towards Hajime’s heart.



[Ahaha, Carelessness is our greatest enemy~. As well as rage o-…….]



Eri’s expression of impatience was quickly changed into one of a smirk but, as if Hajime didn’t feel a thing he continued walking which caused her expression to cramp up. Hajime had probably already knew what was coming up from behind. A mass of red magical power was compressed to the size of a 10 yen coin and completely held off the spear which was thrusted out. It was the derivation of “Vajra”, “Intensive Strengthening”.



Hajime silently turned his left elbow towards his back and without any hesitation, he shot with his shotgun. A roaring sound resounded and at the same time, Kondo who received the attack of great power from super point-blank range in the face, had his head turned into small chunks and blown away. The sound of blood splattering and splashing around was heard clearly.



[~……Kill him]



With a steep expression, Eri ordered the next puppet soldiers and Meld. Although not as much as Kouki, Hajime had held some intimacy with Meld, at the [Orcus Great Labyrinth] it was to the point of using a potion to heal him who was near death. Therefore, she intended to use the chance which exposes itself through hesitation just like it did with Kouki. The puppet soldiers were waiting eagerly for that opening to be exposed.



However, that kind of common-sense judgement won’t work on Hajime.



While disregarding Meld who was coming at him, Hajime took out Metsurai from his “Treasure Warehouse”. All of the sudden from out of no where, the form of brutal weapons appeared and caused everyone present to hold their breaths.



Immediately, Shizuku shouted out.



[Everyone! Lie down!]



Ryutaro and Nagayama while crouched down, dragged down students that were still standing onto the ground.



Immediately after that, with the unique rotation sound and shooting sound resounding out, the incarnation of destruction roared out. It was once used to completely crush all golems that the liberator manipulated, turned huge crowds of demons into a sea of blood, the fangs of the monster which offsetted even the silver feathers of death which “God’s Apostle” shot out. That kind of thing was released, there was no way the puppet soldiers would be able to withstand it.



The electrically charged bullets weren’t lukewarm enough to just be said to have shot just one person, it went and broke through all obstacles, while blowing away the plaza wall as if it were just paper trash, with Hajime as the center, everything was being cut down. The puppet soldiers bodies were crushed, reduced into lumps of flesh which scattered around and could not be distinguished at all.



Before long, Metsurai’s roaring stopped and once again foot steps echoed in the silent plaza. Everyone who was laying down on the ground were motionless, naturally the one who was walking after the attack which mowed down everything in its path was Hajime.



Everyone else was similarly desperately lowering their heads until the storm passed by, the tip of shoes appeared in front of Eri’s eyes. Eri slowly raised her face. She glanced up at the owner of the shoes, what she saw there was a pair of eyes which looked at her as if she was just a pebble on the roadside without value. Hajime no longer carried Metsurai in his hands. He was simply standing above Eri and looking down on her.



Eri couldn’t say anything and only returned the gaze with an aghast expression, then Hajime slowly began to open his mouth.



[And?]



[~……..]



Hajime had no further information on what Eri had done. He just simply understood that she was an enemy. If it was simply an enemy then all he had to do was mercilessly murder it and everything would end. However, Eri had touched something which she should have never touched. It was already at the point where just killing her wasn’t enough anymore. Before she died, she needs to feel “despair”……



That’s why Hajime asked her a question. What else can you do? You can’t do anything huh?



Eri accurately understood what he meant and began to tightly grit her teeth. The edge of her lip had a cut and blood was dripping down. Up until now she was the owner of this place, she should have been in the position with an overwhelming advantage, however, in an instant Hajime had unreasonably overturned that which caused her to hold hatred and awe.



The moment that Eri was about to unintentionally curse out passionately at him, the muzzle of a gun was suddenly pushed against her forehead.



Eri swallowed up her curses as the quick draw was so quick, she wasn’t even able to comprehend when it was pulled out.



[……..Whatever your motive was, I have no intentions of hearing any of those worthless things. If you’ve got nothing left to show then…..die]



Hajime’s finger began to pull on the trigger. The Hajime in Eri’s eyes right now was someone who would murder his own classmates himself and realised that even if she had turned Kaori into a puppet he wouldn’t have even hesitated.



——I’m dead.



Eri’s head was completely filled up with those words. However, Eri’s devilish luck seems to have not run out yet.



The moment when Eri’s head was about to splatter, a flame bullet came flying towards Hajime. It’s flames had a considerable amount of power in them. However, it obviously didn’t work against Hajime. He turned Donner’s muzzle towards the flame bullet and with pinpoint accuracy, he shot through it’s core and it easily dispersed.



[Naaguumooo-!!]



From the interior of the dispersing flame bullet was Hiyama who was covered in wounds, and it was doubtful if he was capable of human speech anymore as he was calling out Hajime’s name in an odd tone. With a sword in his hand, a large amount of blood being vomited out of his mouth, and his right shoulder broken and badly damaged which hung down as he aimlessly flung himself at Hajime. He no longer looked like an impudent ogre, now he only looked like some kind of ugly variant of a creature.



[…..Shut up]



Hajime braced himself like it was a hassle as Hiyama ran up and performed a worthless kick. Dogon~! an explosion sounding like a sonic boom resounded and Hiyama’s body was floating in the air. He wasn’t blown away because the shockwave wasn’t allowed to leave his body.



Then as Hiyama was just floating in the air, Hajime lifted his leg up towards the sky, and swung it down with intense force. It was exactly like his heel drop was an axe swung down to chop firewood, it mercilessly struck Hiyama’s head and threw him onto the ground. The ground cracked because of the impact and Hiyama’s fresh blood from his head was splattering into those cracks. Hiyama who bounced up like a brick was already white eyed and lost his consciousness.



Anyone who saw him could see that he was already barely alive. However, Hajime had a quality which wouldn’t let up. His bouncing head was once again kicked upwards to float in the air. Was something secretly carried out? With that impact, Hiyama regained his consciousness.



Hajime gripped Hiyama’s neck and raised him up into the air. Hiyama who was hanging in midair was violently thrashing around without any power, Hajime who had inhumane strength was unphased.



[Yo”u! Iz not fo yo”u, Gaori wud, be mine!]



He was overflowing with grudge and murderous intent. It was shivering to think that a human could fall this low with ugliness. Would an ordinary man divert his eyes away? They would likely be overcome by feelings of sickness and run away.



However, Hajime didn’t show that kind of reaction towards Hiyama’s. Rather on the contrary, Hajime’s eyes held pitty.



[No matter if I existed or not, the results would have been the same. At the very least, with your nature nothing would have happened even if the world was overturned]*I think, ??????????????????????????????*



[Iz’s yor fault]



[Don’t place the blames on others. The reason you fell so low was your own fault. Even in Japan and over here, you were always the loser. not “someone else”. it was “yourself”. All you did was criticise everyone else in dissatisfaction while not shouldering anything for yourself. …..you’re a genuine underdog]



[I’lr kill ju! Desinitely, jus you!]



Hiyama became further enraged and insane from Hajime’s words. After Hajime looked at the underdog who continued to lose himself, he noticed something in the distance and looked towards it. What was over in that direction was the vanguard of demons who invaded the Kingdom.



Hajime returned his cold gaze onto Hiyama, then once again threw him up into the air, and with a blow from his artificial arm he hit where Hiyama was falling down according to gravity. Rotational force was applied in with the impact and Hiyama began rotating like a top.



[Let’s test if you can survive or not. Ma~a, it’s probably impossible for you]



Hajime also hammered him with a spinning kick which caused the air to be blown away. Hiyama let out an unpleasant sound and was blown outside of the plaza by the shockwave.



Rather than quickly shooting Hiyama to death, Hajime was unconsciously avoiding his vitals and pummeled him. It wasn’t revenge for dropping him into the abyss, it was revenge for injuring Kaori.



Although he doesn’t know the amount of awareness the actual person in question has, Hajime began to think that just killing him off comfortably wasn’t enough. That was how he thought of the idea of kicking Hiyama into the crowd of demons after just barely keeping him alive.



However, due to dealing with Hiyama, the time he had to kill Eri was shortened. Although Eri didn’t run away, an aurora was shot at Hajime.



[Chi….]



Hajime jumped back while clicking his tongue and used Donner to shoot where the aurora had come from. Three explosions roared out simultaneously, like a dragon climbing up the waterfall of aurora, 3 flashes tore through the sky.



Immediately afterwards, the aurora’s trajectory bent, it nearly baked Kouki but, thanks to Eri they managed to evade somehow. Even for Eri, it would be a bad joke that she didn’t want any part in if kouki was completely wiped out due to friendly fire.



Soon, the aurora calmed down and Freed descended down on his white dragon.



[……That’s enough. Boy with white hair. If you don’t want to lose anymore of your precious compatriots and Kingdom citizens, then settle down]



It appears that Freed was under the misconception that Hajime was fighting for Kouki and them and the Kingdom. If you looked around the surrounding area, you’d notice that demons had already surrounded Ryutaro and them, Shizuku, and aiming at Teio and Aiko.



If Hajime and them seriously fought back, there would be a great deal of collateral damage so they decided to take on hostages instead. Although Hajime doesn’t know that Freed was already severely injured by Yue, Freed realized that and used this as a last resort. It should be noted that the wounds caused by Yue, although far from being completely healed, was healed by the white crow’s inherent magic.



Then, at that time, as if something happened to Kaori, Teio called out loudly to Hajime.



[Master! I’ve somehow fixed it for now! However, any more than this…..will take time….If possible, I’d like to have Yue’s cooperation as well. We can’t leave it as a temporary fix forever!]



Hajime nodded powerfully as he looked behind his shoulder at Teio. The classmates who didn’t understand the circumstances had dubious expressions. However, Freed who also had Age of God’s magic had somehow managed to guess, he looked at Teio’s magic with wide eyes.



[Ho~o, new Age of God’s magic…..by chance is it [Kamiyama’s]? Then it would do you well to tell me of it’s location. If you defy me then y-!?]



The moment that Freed tried to threaten Hajime and them for the location of [Kamiyama] great labyrinth, flames erupted from Donner. Immediately, the turtle-type demon set up a barrier and somehow managed to endure it from being fully destroyed. Freed narrowed his eyes and the surrounding demons closed in more.



[What’s the meaning of this? Are your compatriots lives not important? The more you guys resist, the more the Kingdom’s citizens will suffer as well? Or are you such a fool that you can’t comprehend that? There are 100,000 monsters at the outer wall and on the other side of the gate is 1 million demons. No matter how strong you guys are, continuing to fight while protecting everything is…..]



Hajime who received those words, turned his cold eyes away from freed and towards the outside of the Kingdom—an army of 100,000 was trying to invade into the Kingdom. Then, he silently took out an induction stone which was the size of a fist out of his “Treasure Warehouse”. He activated the induction stone while disregarding Freed’s dubious look and emitted a light which was uncomparable to the ring which manipulated the crossbitts.



